Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1969.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 4300 of Title 59, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The purpose of this Compact shall be to reduce the burdens


on state governments and to facilitate the interstate practice and


regulation of massage therapy with the goal of improving public


access to and the safety of massage therapy services. Through this


Compact, the member states seek to establish a regulatory framework


which provides for a new multistate licensing program. Through this


additional licensing pathway, the member states seek to provide


increased value and mobility to licensed massage therapists in the


member states, while ensuring the provision of safe, competent, and


reliable services to the public.

Req. No. 2738 Page 3


B. This Compact is designed to achieve the following


objectives, and the member states hereby ratify the same intentions


by subscribing to:


1. Increase public access to massage therapy services by


providing for a multistate licensing pathway;


2. Enhance the member states’ ability to protect the public’s


health and safety;


3. Enhance the member states’ ability to prevent human


trafficking and licensure fraud;


4. Encourage the cooperation of member states in regulating the


multistate practice of massage therapy;


5. Support relocating military members and their spouses;


6. Facilitate and enhance the exchange of licensure,


investigative, and disciplinary information between the member


states;


7. Create an Interstate Commission that shall exist to


implement and administer the Compact;


8. Allow a member state to hold a licensee accountable, even


when that licensee holds a multistate license;


9. Create a streamlined pathway for licensees to practice in


member states, increasing the mobility of duly licensed massage


therapists; and


10. Serve the needs of licensed massage therapists and the


public receiving their services.

Req. No. 2738 Page 4


C. Nothing in this Compact shall be intended to prevent a state


from enforcing its own laws regarding the practice of massage


therapy.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 4301 of Title 59, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


As used in this act:


1. “Active military member” means any person with full-time


duty status in the Armed Forces of the United States, including


members of the National Guard and Reserve;


2. “Adverse action” means any administrative, civil, equitable,


or criminal action permitted by a member state’s laws which is


imposed by a licensing authority or other regulatory body against a


licensee including, but not limited to, actions against an


individual’s authorization to practice such as revocation,


suspension, probation, surrender in lieu of discipline, monitoring


of the licensee, limitation of the licensee’s practice, or any other


encumbrance on licensure affecting an individual’s ability to


practice massage therapy, including the issuance of a cease and


desist order;


3. “Alternative program” means a non-disciplinary monitoring or


prosecutorial diversion program approved by a member state’s


licensing authority;



Req. No. 2738 Page 5


4. “Authorization to practice” means a legal authorization by a


remote state pursuant to a multistate license permitting the


practice of massage therapy in that remote state, which shall be


subject to the enforcement jurisdiction of the licensing authority


in that remote state;


5. “Background check” means the submission of an applicant’s


criminal history record information, as further defined in 28


C.F.R., Section 20.3(d), as amended, to the Federal Bureau of


Investigation and the agency responsible for retaining state


criminal records in the applicant’s home state;


6. “Charter member states” means member states who have enacted


legislation to adopt this Compact where such legislation predates


the effective date of this Compact pursuant to Section 12 of this


act;


7. “Commission” means the government agency whose membership


consists of all states that have enacted this Compact and operates


as an instrumentality of the member states, known as the Interstate


Massage Compact Commission;


8. “Continuing competence” means a requirement, as a condition


of license renewal, to provide evidence of participation in, and


completion of, educational or professional activities that maintain,


improve, or enhance massage therapy fitness to practice;


9. “Current significant investigative information” means


investigative information that a licensing authority, after an

Req. No. 2738 Page 6


inquiry or investigation that complies with a member state’s due


process requirements, has reason to believe is not groundless and,


if proved true, would indicate a violation of the state’s laws


regarding the practice of massage therapy;


10. “Data system” means a repository of information about


licensees who hold multistate licenses including, but not limited


to, license status, investigative information, and adverse actions;


11. “Disqualifying event” means any event which shall


disqualify an individual from holding a multistate license under


this Compact, which the Commission may specify by rule;


12. “Encumbrance” means a revocation or suspension of, or any


limitation or condition on, the full and unrestricted practice of


massage therapy by a licensing authority;


13. “Executive committee” means a group of delegates elected or


appointed to act on behalf of and within the powers granted to it by


the Commission;


14. “Home state” means the member state which is the licensee’s


primary state of residence where the licensee holds an active


single-state license;


15. “Investigative information” means information, records, or


documents received or generated by a licensing authority pursuant to


an investigation or other inquiry;





Req. No. 2738 Page 7


16. “Licensing authority” means a state’s regulatory body


responsible for issuing massage therapy licenses or otherwise


overseeing the practice of massage therapy in that state;


17. “Licensee” means an individual who currently holds a


license from a member state to fully practice massage therapy, whose


license is not a student, provisional, temporary, inactive, or other


similar license status;


18. “Massage therapy”, “massage therapy services”, and


“practice of massage therapy” mean the care and services provided by


a licensee as set forth in a member state’s statutes and regulations


in the state where the services are being provided;


19. “Member state” means any state that has adopted this


Compact;


20. “Multistate license” means a license that consists of


authorizations to practice massage therapy in all remote states


pursuant to this Compact, which shall be subject to the enforcement


jurisdiction of the licensing authority in a licensee’s home state;


21. “Remote state” means any member state other than the


licensee’s home state;


22. “Rule” means any opinion or regulation promulgated by the


Commission under this Compact, which shall have the force of law;


23. “Single-state license” means a current, valid authorization


issued by a member state’s licensing authority allowing an


individual to fully practice massage therapy that is not a

Req. No. 2738 Page 8


restricted, student, provisional, temporary, or inactive practice


authorization and authorizes practice only within the issuing state;


and


24. “State” means a state, territory, possession of the United


States, or the District of Columbia.


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 4302 of Title 59, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. To be eligible to join this Compact, and to maintain


eligibility as a member state, a state shall:


1. License and regulate the practice of massage therapy;


2. Have a mechanism or entity in place to receive and


investigate complaints from the public, regulatory or law


enforcement agencies, or the Commission about licensees practicing


in that state;


3. Accept passage of a psychometrically valid national


examination as a criterion for massage therapy licensure in that


state. For purposes of this Compact, such examination shall not


include a state-administered examination but shall be inclusive of:


a. the Massage and Bodywork Licensure Examination,


b. National Certification Board for Therapeutic Massage


and Bodywork licensure examination prior to January 1,


2015, and



Req. No. 2738 Page 9


c. the substantial equivalent of subparagraph a and b of


this paragraph, which the Interstate Massage Compact


Commission may approve by rule;


4. Require that licensees satisfy educational requirements


prior to being licensed to provide massage therapy services to the


public in that state;


5. Implement procedures for requiring the background check of


applicants for a multistate license and for the reporting of any


disqualifying events including, but not limited to, obtaining and


submitting, for each licensee holding a multistate license and each


applicant for a multistate license, fingerprint or other biometric-


based information to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for


background checks; and receiving the results of the background


checks and considering the results of such a background check in


making licensure decisions;


6. Have continuing competence requirements as a condition for


license renewal;


7. Participate in the data system, including through the use of


unique identifying numbers pursuant to subsection B of Section 9 of


this act;


8. Notify the Commission and other member states, in compliance


with the terms of the Compact and rules of the Commission, of any


disciplinary action taken by the state against a licensee practicing


under a multistate license in that state or of the existence of

Req. No. 2738 Page 10


investigative information or current significant investigative


information regarding a licensee practicing in that state pursuant


to a multistate license;


9. Comply with the rules of the Commission; and


10. Accept licensees with valid multistate licenses from other


member states.


B. Individuals not residing in a member state shall continue to


be able to apply for a member state’s single-state license as


provided under the laws of each member state. However, the single-


state license granted to those individuals shall not be recognized


as granting a multistate license for massage therapy in any other


member state.


C. Nothing in this Compact shall affect the requirements


established by a member state for the issuance of a single-state


license.


D. A multistate license issued to a licensee shall be


recognized by each remote state as an authorization to practice


massage therapy in each remote state.


SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 4303 of Title 59, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. To qualify for a multistate license under this Compact and


to maintain eligibility for such license, an applicant shall:



Req. No. 2738 Page 11


1. Hold an active single-state license to practice massage


therapy in the applicant’s home state;


2. Satisfy one of the following:


a. completion of at least six hundred twenty-five (625)


hours of massage therapy education,


b. graduation from an educational program that meets the


minimum qualifications for licensure in the home state


and two (2) years of continuous licensure with a


single-state license in good standing in the home


state except as provided in Section 7 of this act, or


c. satisfaction of the substantial equivalent of


subparagraph a or b of this paragraph;


3. Successfully pass a psychometrically valid national


examination. For purposes of this Compact, such examination shall


not include a state-administered examination but shall be inclusive


of:


a. the Massage and Bodywork Licensure Examination,


b. National Certification Board for Therapeutic Massage


and Bodywork licensure examination prior to January 1,


2015, and


c. the substantial equivalent of subparagraph a and b of


this paragraph, which the Commission may approve by


rule;


4. Submit to a background check;

Req. No. 2738 Page 12


5. Have not been convicted or found guilty, or have entered


into an agreed disposition, of:


a. a felony offense under applicable state or federal


criminal law, within five (5) years prior to the date


of his or her application. Such time period shall not


include any time served for the offense, provided that


the applicant has completed any and all requirements


imposed as a result of any such offense,


b. a misdemeanor offense related to the practice of


massage therapy under applicable state or federal


criminal law, within two (2) years prior to the date


of his or her application. Such time period shall not


include any time served for the offense, and provided


that the applicant has completed any and all


requirements arising as a result of any such offense,


or


c. any offense, whether a misdemeanor or a felony, under


state or federal law, at any time, relating to any of


the following:


(1) kidnapping,


(2) human trafficking,


(3) human smuggling,


(4) sexual battery, sexual assault, or any related


offenses, or

Req. No. 2738 Page 13


(5) any other category of offense, which the


Commission may designate by rule;


6. Have not previously held a massage therapy license which was


revoked by, or surrendered in lieu of discipline to an applicable


licensing authority;


7. Have no history of any adverse action on any occupational or


professional license within two (2) years prior to the date of his


or her application; and


8. Pay all required fees.


B. A multistate license granted pursuant to this Compact may be


effective for a definite period of time concurrent with the renewal


of the home state license.


C. A licensee practicing in a member state shall be subject to


all scope of practice laws governing massage therapy services in


that state.


D. The practice of massage therapy under a multistate license


granted pursuant to this Compact shall subject the licensee to the


jurisdiction of the licensing authority, the courts, and the laws of


the member state in which the massage therapy services are provided.


SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 4304 of Title 59, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:





Req. No. 2738 Page 14


A. Nothing in this Compact or any rule of the Interstate


Massage Compact Commission shall be construed to limit, restrict, or


in any way reduce the ability of a:


1. Member state to enact and enforce laws, regulations, or


other rules related to the practice of massage therapy in that


state, where those laws, regulations, or other rules are not


inconsistent with the provisions of this Compact;


2. Member state to take adverse action against a licensee’s


single-state license to practice massage therapy in that state;


3. Remote state to take adverse action against a licensee’s


authorization to practice in that state; or


4. Licensee’s home state to take adverse action against a


licensee’s multistate license based upon information provided by a


remote state.


B. A member state’s licensing authority shall cooperate with


the Commission and with each entity exercising independent


regulatory authority over the practice of massage therapy according


to the provisions of this Compact.


SECTION 6. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 4305 of Title 59, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. A licensee’s home state shall have exclusive power to impose


an adverse action against a licensee’s multistate license issued by


the home state.

Req. No. 2738 Page 15


B. A home state may take adverse action on a multistate license


based on the investigative information, current significant


investigative information, or adverse action of a remote state.


C. A home state shall retain authority to complete any pending


investigations of a licensee practicing under a multistate license


who changes his or her home state during the course of such


investigation. The licensing authority shall be empowered to report


the results of such investigation to the Commission through the data


system pursuant to Section 9 of this act.


D. Any member state may investigate actual or alleged


violations of the scope of practice laws in any other member state


for a massage therapist who holds a multistate license.


E. A remote state shall have the authority to:


1. Take adverse actions against a licensee’s authorization to


practice;


2. Issue cease and desist orders or impose an encumbrance on a


licensee’s authorization to practice in that state;


3. Issue subpoenas for both hearings and investigations that


require the attendance and testimony of witnesses, as well as the


production of evidence. Subpoenas issued by a licensing authority


in a member state for the attendance and testimony of witnesses or


the production of evidence from another member state shall be


enforced in the latter state by any court of competent jurisdiction,


according to the practice and procedure of such court applicable to

Req. No. 2738 Page 16


subpoenas issued in proceedings before it. The issuing licensing


authority shall pay any witness fees, travel expenses, milage, and


other fees required by the service statutes in the state in which


the witnesses or other evidence is located;


4. If otherwise permitted by state law, recover from the


affected licensee the costs of investigations and disposition of


cases resulting from any adverse action taken against the licensee;


and


5. Take adverse action against the licensee’s authorization to


practice in that state based on the factual findings of another


member state.


F. If an adverse action is taken by the home state against a


licensee’s multistate license or single-state license to practice in


the home state, the licensee’s authorization to practice in all


other member states shall be deactivated until all encumbrances have


been removed from such license. All home state disciplinary orders


that impose an adverse action against a licensee shall include a


statement that the massage therapist’s authorization to practice is


deactivated in all member states during the pendency of the order.


G. If adverse action is taken by a remote state against a


licensee’s authorization to practice, that adverse action shall


apply to all authorizations to practice in all remote states. A


licensee whose authorization to practice in a remote state is


removed for a specified period of time shall not be eligible to

Req. No. 2738 Page 17


apply for a new multistate license in any other state until the


specified time for removal of the authorization to practice has


passed and all encumbrance requirements are satisfied.


H. Nothing in this Compact shall override a member state’s


authority to accept a licensee’s participation in an alternative


program in lieu of adverse action. A licensee’s multistate license


shall be suspended for the duration of the licensee’s participation


in any alternative program.


I. In addition to the authority granted to a member state by


its respective scope of practice laws or other applicable state


laws, a member state may participate with other member states in


joint investigations of licensees. Member states shall share any


investigative, litigation, or compliance materials in furtherance of


any joint or individual investigation initiated under the Compact.


SECTION 7. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 4306 of Title 59, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


Active military members or their spouses shall designate a home


state where the individual has a current license to practice massage


therapy in good standing. The individual may retain his or her home


state designation during any period of service when that individual


or his or her spouse is on active-duty assignment. Active military


members or their spouses shall satisfy the provisions of paragraph 2


of subsection A of Section 4 of this act by successful graduation

Req. No. 2738 Page 18


from an educational program that meets the minimum qualifications


for licensure in the designated home state.


SECTION 8. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 4307 of Title 59, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The compact member states hereby create and establish a


joint government agency, known as the Interstate Massage Compact


Commission, whose membership consists of all member states that have


enacted the Compact. The membership shall be an instrumentality of


the compact states acting jointly and not as an instrumentality of


any one state. The Commission shall come into existence on or after


the effective date of the compact pursuant to Section 12 of this


act.


B. 1. Each member state shall have and be limited to one


delegate selected by that member state’s state licensing authority.


The delegate shall be a member of the state licensing authority or


the primary administrative officer of the state licensing authority


or his or her designee.


2. The Commission shall establish, by rule or bylaw, a term of


office for delegates and may, by rule or bylaw, establish term


limits.


3. The Commission may recommend removal or suspension of any


delegate from office.



Req. No. 2738 Page 19


4. A member state’s state licensing authority shall fill any


vacancy of its delegate occurring in the Commission within sixty


(60) days of the vacancy.


5. Each delegate shall be entitled to one vote on all matters


that are voted on by the Commission.


6. The Commission shall meet at least once during each calendar


year. Additional meetings may be held as set forth in the bylaws.


The Commission may meet by telecommunication, video conference, or


other similar electronic means.


C. The Commission shall have the powers to:


1. Establish the fiscal year of the Commission;


2. Establish code of conduct and conflict of interest policies;


3. Adopt rules and bylaws;


4. Maintain its financial records in accordance with the


bylaws;


5. Meet and take such actions as are consistent with the


provisions of this Compact, the Commission’s rules, and the bylaws;


6. Initiate and conclude legal proceedings or actions in the


name of the Commission, provided that the standing of any state


licensing authority to sue or be sued under applicable law shall not


be affected;


7. Maintain and certify records and information provided to a


member state as the authenticated business records of the



Req. No. 2738 Page 20


Commission, and designate an agent to do so on the Commission’s


behalf;


8. Purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;


9. Borrow, accept, or contract for services of personnel


including, but not limited to, employees of a member state;


10. Conduct an annual financial review;


11. Hire employees, elect or appoint officers, fix


compensation, define duties, grant such individuals appropriate


authority to carry out the purposes of the Compact, and establish


the Commission’s personnel policies and programs relating to


conflicts of interest, qualifications of personnel, and other


related personnel matters;


12. Assess and collect fees;


13. Provided that the Commission shall avoid any appearance of


impropriety or conflict of interest, accept, receive, utilize, and


dispose of any and all appropriate gifts, donations, grants of


money, other sources of revenue, equipment, supplies, materials, and


services;


14. Lease, purchase, retain, own, hold, improve, or use any


real, personal, or mixed property, or any undivided interest;


15. Sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, abandon,


or otherwise dispose of any real, personal, or mixed property;


16. Establish a budget and make expenditures;


17. Borrow money;

Req. No. 2738 Page 21


18. Appoint committees, including standing committees, composed


of members, state regulators, state legislators or his or her


representatives, and consumer representatives, and such other


interested persons as may be designated in this Compact and the


bylaws;


19. Elect up to two ex officio, nonvoting members of the


Commission as specified in the Commission’s bylaws;


20. Accept and transmit complaints from the public, regulatory


or law enforcement agencies, or the Commission, to the relevant


member states regarding potential misconduct of licensees;


21. Elect a chair, vice chair, secretary, treasurer, and other


such officers of the Commission as provided in the Commission’s


bylaws;


22. Establish and elect an Executive Committee, including a


chair and vice chair;


23. Adopt and provide to the member states an annual report;


24. Determine whether a state’s adopted language is materially


different from the model Compact language such that the state would


not qualify for participation in the Compact; and


25. Perform other functions necessary or appropriate to achieve


the purposes of this Compact.


D. 1. The Executive Committee shall have the power to act on


behalf of the Commission according to the terms of this Compact.



Req. No. 2738 Page 22


The powers, duties, and responsibilities of the Executive Committee


shall include:


a. overseeing the day-to-day activities of the


administration of the Compact including compliance


with the provisions of the Compact, the Commission’s


rules and bylaws, and other such duties as deemed


necessary,


b. recommending to the Commission changes to the rules or


bylaws, changes to this Compact legislation, fees


charged to Compact member states, fees charged to


licensees, and other fees,


c. ensuring Compact administration services are


appropriately provided, included by contract,


d. preparing and recommending the budget,


e. maintaining financial records on behalf of the


Commission,


f. monitoring Compact compliance of member states and


providing compliance reports to the Commission,


g. establishing additional committees as necessary,


h. exercising the powers and duties of the Commission


during the interim between Commission meetings, except


for adopting or amending the rules or bylaws, or


exercising any other powers and duties expressly


reserved to the Commission by rule or bylaw, and

Req. No. 2738 Page 23


i. other duties as provided in the rules or bylaws of the


Commission.


2. The Executive Committee shall be composed of seven (7)


voting members as follows:


a. the chair and vice chair of the Commission and any


other members of the Commission who serve on the


Executive Committee shall be voting members of the


Executive Committee, and


b. other than the chair, vice chair, secretary, and


treasurer, the Commission shall elect three voting


members from the current membership of the Commission.


3. The Commission may remove any member of the Executive


Committee as provided in the Commission’s bylaws.


4. The Executive Committee shall:


a. meet at least annually,


b. have meetings open to the public except when


conducting meetings pursuant to paragraph 3 of


subsection F of this section, and


c. give five (5) business days’ advance notice of its


public meetings, posted on its website, and, as


determined, provide notice to persons with an interest


in the public matters the Executive Committee intends


to address at those meetings.



Req. No. 2738 Page 24


5. The Executive Committee may hold an emergency meeting when


acting for the Commission to:


a. meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, or


welfare,


b. prevent a loss of Commission or participating state


funds, or


c. protect public health and safety.


E. The Commission shall adopt and provide the member states an


annual report.


F. 1. All meetings of the Commission that are not closed


pursuant to paragraph 3 of this subsection shall be open to the


public. Notice of public meetings shall be posted on the


Commission’s website at least thirty (30) days prior to the public


meeting. Notice of all Commission meetings shall provide the time,


date, and location of the meetings, and if the meeting is to be held


or accessible via telecommunication, video conference, or other


electronic means, the notice shall include the mechanism for access


to the meeting.


2. The Commission may convene an emergency public meeting by


providing at least twenty-four (24) hours’ prior notice on the


Commission’s website, and any other means as provided in the


Commission’s rules, for any of the reasons it may dispense with


notice of proposed rulemaking pursuant to Section 10 of this act.



Req. No. 2738 Page 25


The Commission’s legal counsel shall certify that one of the reasons


justifying an emergency public meeting has been met.


3. The Commission may convene in a closed, non-public meeting


for the Commission to discuss the following matters:


a. non-compliance of a member state with its obligations


under the Compact,


b. the employment, compensation, discipline, or other


matters, practices, or procedures related to specific


employees, or other matters related to the


Commission’s internal personnel practices and


procedures,


c. current or threatened discipline of a licensee by the


Commission or by a member state’s licensing authority,


d. current, threatened, or reasonably anticipated


litigation,


e. negotiation of contracts for the purchase, lease, or


sale of goods, services, or real estate,


f. accusing any person of a crime or formally censuring


any person,


g. trade secrets or commercial or financial information


that is privileged or confidential,


h. information of a personal nature where disclosure


would constitute a clearly unwarranted invasion of


personal privacy,

Req. No. 2738 Page 26


i. investigative records compiled for law enforcement


purposes,


j. information related to any investigative reports


prepared by or on behalf of or for use of the


Commission or any other committee charged with


responsibility of investigation or determination of


compliance issues pursuant to the Compact,


k. legal advice,


l. matters specifically exempted from disclosure to the


public by federal or member state law, or


m. other matters as promulgated by the Commission by


rule.


4. The Commission shall keep minutes that fully and clearly


describe all matters discussed in a meeting and shall provide a full


and accurate summary of actions taken, reasons for such actions, and


a description of all views expressed. If a meeting, or portion of a


meeting, is closed, the presiding officer shall state that the


meeting will be closed and reference each relevant exempting


provision, and such references shall be recorded in the minutes.


All minutes and documents of a closed meeting shall remain under


seal, subject to release only by a majority vote of the Commission


or order of a court of competent jurisdiction.





Req. No. 2738 Page 27


G. 1. The Commission shall pay, or provide for the payment of,


the reasonable expenses of its establishment, organization, and


ongoing activities.


2. The Commission may accept any and all appropriate sources of


revenue, donations, and grants of money, equipment, supplies,


materials, and services.


3. The Commission may levy on and collect an annual assessment


from each member state and impose fees on licensees of member states


to whom it grants a multistate license to cover the cost of


operations and activities of the Commission and its staff, which


shall be a total amount sufficient to cover its annual budget as


approved each year for which revenue is not provided by other


sources. The aggregate annual assessment amount for member states


shall be allocated based upon a formula that the Commission shall


promulgate by rule.


4. The Commission shall not incur obligations of any kind prior


to securing the funds adequate to meet the obligations. The


Commission shall not pledge the credit of any member states, except


by and with the authority of the member state.


5. The Commission shall keep accurate accounts of all receipts


and disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of the Commission


shall be subject to the financial review and accounting procedures


established under its bylaws and annual financial review by a


certified or licensed public accountant. The report of the

Req. No. 2738 Page 28


financial review shall be included in and become part of the annual


report of the Commission.


H. 1. Each member, officer, executive director, employees, and


representative of the Commission shall be immune from suit and


liability, both personally and in his or her official capacity, for


any claim for damage to or loss of property or personal injury or


other civil liability caused by or arising out of any actual or


alleged act, error, or omission that occurred, or that the person


against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing


occurred within the scope of Commission employment, duties, or


responsibilities. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to


protect any such person from suit or liability for any damage, loss,


injury, or liability caused by the intentional or willful or wanton


misconduct of that person. The procurement of insurance of any type


by the Commission shall not compromise or limit the immunity granted


by this subsection.


2. The Commission shall defend any member, officer, executive


director, employee, and representative of the Commission in any


civil action seeking to impose liability arising out of any actual


or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred within or as


determined by the Commission that the person against whom the claim


is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the


scope of Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities.


Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to prohibit such person

Req. No. 2738 Page 29


from retaining his or her own counsel at his or her own expense or


that the actual or alleged act, error, or omission did not result


from that person’s intentional or willful or wanton misconduct.


3. The Commission shall indemnify and hold harmless any member,


officer, executive director, employee, and representative of the


Commission for the amount of any settlement or judgment obtained


against that person arising out of any actual or alleged act, error,


or omission that occurred within or as determined by the Commission


that the person against whom the claim is made had a reasonable


basis for believing occurred within the scope of Commission


employment, duties, or responsibilities, provided that the actual


act, error, or omission did not result from the intentional or


willful or wanton misconduct of that person.


I. Nothing in this Compact shall be construed as a limitation


on the liability of any licensee for professional malpractice or


misconduct, which shall be governed solely by any other applicable


state laws.


J. Nothing in this Compact shall be interpreted to waive or


otherwise abrogate a member state’s state action immunity or state


action affirmative defense with respect to antitrust claims under


the Sherman Act, Clayton Act, or any other state or federal


antitrust or anticompetitive law or regulation.


K. Nothing in this Compact shall be construed to be a waiver of


sovereign immunity by the member states or by the Commission.

Req. No. 2738 Page 30


SECTION 9. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 4308 of Title 59, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The Interstate Massage Compact Commission shall provide for


the development, maintenance, operation, and utilization of a


coordinated database and reporting system.


B. The Commission shall assign each applicant for a multistate


license a unique identifier, as determined by the rules of the


Commission.


C. Notwithstanding any other provisions of state law, a member


state shall submit a uniform data set to the data system on all


individuals to whom this Compact is applicable as required by the


rules of the Commission, including:


1. Identifying information;


2. Licensure data;


3. Adverse actions against a licensee and any related


information;


4. Non-confidential information related to alterative program


participation, the beginning and ending dates of such participation,


and other information related to such participation;


5. Any denial of application for licensure, and the reasons for


such denial, not including any criminal history record information


where prohibited by law;



Req. No. 2738 Page 31


6. The existence of current significant investigative


information or investigative information; and


7. Other information that may facilitate the administration of


this Compact or the protection of the public, as determined by the


rules of the Commission.


D. The records and information provided to a member state


pursuant to this Compact or through the data system, when certified


by the Commission or an agent of the Commission, shall constitute


the authenticated business records of the Commission, and shall be


entitled to any associated hearsay exception in any relevant


judicial, quasi-judicial, or administrative proceedings in a member


state.


E. The existence of current significant investigative


information and investigative information pertaining to a licensee


in any member state shall be available only to other member states.


F. It shall be the responsibility of the member states to


report any adverse action against a licensee who holds a multistate


license and to monitor the database to determine whether adverse


action has been taken against a multistate licensee or license


applicant. Adverse action information pertaining to a licensee or


license applicant in any member state shall be available to any


other member state.





Req. No. 2738 Page 32


G. Member states contributing information to the data system


may designate information that shall not be shared with the public


without the express permission of the contributing state.


H. Any information submitted to the data system that is


subsequently expunged pursuant to federal laws or the laws of the


member state contributing the information shall be removed from the


data system.


SECTION 10. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 4309 of Title 59, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The Interstate Massage Compact Commission shall promulgate


reasonable rules in order to effectively and efficiently implement


and administer the purposes and provisions of this Compact. A rule


shall be invalid and have no force or effect only if a court of


competent jurisdiction holds that the rule is invalid because the


Commission exercised its rulemaking authority in a manner that is


beyond the scope and purposes of the Compact, or the powers granted


by this Compact, or based upon another applicable standard of


review.


B. The rules of the Commission shall have the force of law in


each member state, provided that where the rules of the Commission


conflict with the laws of the member state that establishes the


member state’s scope of practice as held by a court of competent



Req. No. 2738 Page 33


jurisdiction, the rules of the Commission shall be ineffective in


that state to the extent of the conflict.


C. The Commission shall exercise its rulemaking powers pursuant


to the criteria set forth in this act and the adopted rules. Rules


shall become binding as of the date specified by the Commission for


each rule.


D. A rule shall have no further force and effect in any member


state or to any state applying to participate in the Compact if a


majority of the legislatures of the member states rejects a rule or


portion of a rule by enactment of a statute or resolution in the


same manner used to adopt the Compact within four (4) years of the


date of adoption of the rule.


E. Rules shall be adopted at a regular or special meeting of


the Commission.


F. The Commission shall hold a public hearing and allow persons


to provide oral and written comments, data, facts, opinions, and


arguments prior to adoption of a proposed rule. Prior to the


adoption of a proposed rule by the Commission, the Commission shall


provide a notice of proposed rulemaking at least thirty (30) days in


advance of the meeting at which the Commission will hold a public


hearing on the proposed rule. The notice shall be provided on the


website of the Commission or other publicly accessible platform, to


persons who have requested notice of the Commission’s notices of



Req. No. 2738 Page 34


proposed rulemaking and in any other ways the Commission may specify


by rule. The notice shall include:


1. The time, date, and location of the public hearing at which


the Commission will hear public comment and, if different, the time,


date and location of the meeting where the Commission will consider


and vote on the proposed rule;


2. The mechanism for access to the hearing if being held via


telecommunication, video conference, or other electronic means;


3. The text and reason of the proposed rule;


4. A request for comments on the proposed rule from any


interested person; and


5. The manner for which interested persons may submit written


comments.


G. All hearings shall be recorded and a copy of the recording,


all written comments, and documents received by the Commission in


response to the proposed rule shall be available to the public.


H. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a


separate hearing on each rule. Rules may be grouped for the


convenience of the Commission.


I. 1. The Commission shall, by majority vote of all


Commissioners, take final action on the proposed rule.


2. The Commission may adopt changes to the proposed rule,


provided the changes do not enlarge the original purpose of the


proposed rule.

Req. No. 2738 Page 35


3. The Commission shall provide an explanation of the reasons


for substantive changes made to the proposed rule as well as reasons


for substantive changes not made that were recommended by


commenters.


4. The Commission shall determine a reasonable effective date


for the rule. The effective date of the rule shall be no earlier


than thirty (30) days after the Commission issues the notice that it


has adopted or amended the rule except for an emergency as provided


by subsection J of this section.


J. The Commission may consider and adopt an emergency rule


within twenty-four (24) hours’ notice, provided that the usual


rulemaking procedures provided in the Compact shall be retroactively


applied to the rule as soon as reasonably possible and no later than


ninety (90) days after the effective date of the rule. An emergency


rule shall:


1. Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, or


welfare;


2. Prevent a loss of Commission or member state funds;


3. Meet a deadline for the promulgation of a rule that is


established by federal law or rule; or


4. Protect public health and safety.


K. The Commission or an authorized committee of the Commission


may direct revisions to a previously adopted rule for purposes of


correcting typographical errors, errors in format, errors in

Req. No. 2738 Page 36


consistency, or grammatical errors. Public notice of any revisions


shall be posted on the website of the Commission. The revision


shall be subject to challenge by any person for a period of thirty


(30) days after posting. The revision may be challenged only on


grounds that the revision results in a material change to a rule. A


challenge shall be made in writing and delivered to the Commission


prior to the end of the notice period. If no challenge is made, the


revision will take effect without further action. If the revision


is challenged, the revision may not take effect without the approval


of the Commission.


L. No member states rulemaking requirements shall apply under


this Compact.


SECTION 11. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 4310 of Title 59, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. 1. The executive and judicial branches of state government


in each member state shall enforce this Compact and take all actions


necessary and appropriate to implement the Compact.


2. Venue is proper and judicial proceedings by or against the


Commission shall be brought solely and exclusively in a court of


competent jurisdiction where the principal office of the Commission


is located. The Commission may waive venue and jurisdictional


defenses to the extent it adopts or consents to participate in


alternative dispute resolution proceedings. Nothing in this section

Req. No. 2738 Page 37


shall affect or limit the selection or propriety of venue in any


action against a licensee for professional malpractice, misconduct,


or any similar matter.


3. The Commission shall be entitled to receive service of


process in any proceeding regarding the enforcement or


interpretation of the Compact and shall have standing to intervene


in such a proceeding for all purposes. Failure to provide the


Commission service of process shall render a judgment or order void


as to the Commission, this Compact, or promulgated rules.


B. If the Commission determines that a member state has


defaulted in the performance of its obligations or responsibilities


under this Compact or the promulgated rules, the Commission shall


provide written notice to the defaulting state. The notice of


default shall describe the default, the proposed means of curing the


default, and any other action that the Commission may take, and


shall offer training and specific technical assistance regarding the


default. The Commission shall provide a copy of the notice of


default to other member states.


C. If a state in default fails to cure the default, the


defaulting state may be terminated from the Compact upon an


affirmative vote of a majority of the delegates of the member


states, and all rights, privileges, and benefits conferred on that


state by this Compact may be terminated on the effective date of


termination.

Req. No. 2738 Page 38


D. Termination of membership in the Compact shall be imposed


only after all other means of securing compliance have been


exhausted. Notice of intent to suspend or terminate shall be given


by the Commission to the governor, the majority and minority leaders


of the defaulting state’s legislature, the defaulting state’s state


licensing authority, and each of the member state’s state licensing


authority.


E. A state that has been terminated shall be responsible for


all assessments, obligations, and liabilities incurred through the


effective date of termination, including obligations that extend


beyond the effective date of termination.


F. Upon the termination of a state’s membership from this


Compact, that state shall immediately provide notice to all


licensees who hold a multistate license within that state of such


termination. The terminated state shall continue to recognize all


licenses granted pursuant to this Compact for a minimum of one


hundred eighty (180) days after the date of such notice of


termination.


G. The Commission shall not bear any costs related to a state


that is found to be in default or that has been terminated from the


Compact, unless agreed upon in writing between the Commission and


the defaulting state.


H. The defaulting state may appeal the action of the Commission


by petitioning the United States District Court for the District of

Req. No. 2738 Page 39


Columbia or the federal district where the Commission has its


principal offices. The prevailing party shall be awarded all costs


of such litigation, including reasonable attorney fees.


I. 1. Upon request by a member state, the Commission shall


attempt to resolve disputes related to the Compact that arise among


member states and between member and non-member states.


2. The Commission shall promulgate a rule providing for both


mediation and binding dispute resolution for disputes as


appropriate.


J. 1. The Commission, in the reasonable exercise of its


discretion, shall enforce the provisions of this Compact and the


Commission’s rules.


2. By majority vote as provided by Commission rule, the


Commission may initiate legal action against a member state in


default in the United States District Court for the District of


Columbia or the federal district where the Commission has its


principal offices to enforce compliance with the provisions of the


Compact and its promulgated rules. The relief sought may include


both injunctive relief and damages. In the event judicial


enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party shall be awarded all


costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney fees. The


remedies shall not be the exclusive remedies of the Commission. The


Commission may pursue any other remedies available under federal or


the defaulting member state’s law.

Req. No. 2738 Page 40


3. A member state may initiate legal action against the


Commission in the United States District Court for the District of


Columbia or the federal district where the Commission has its


principal offices to enforce compliance with the provisions of the


Compact and its promulgated rules. The relief sought may include


both injunctive relief and damages. In the event judicial


enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party shall be awarded all


costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney fees.


4. No individual or entity other than a member state may


enforce this Compact against the Commission.


SECTION 12. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 4311 of Title 59, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. 1. The Compact shall come into effect on the date which the


Compact statute is enacted into law in the seventh member state. On


or after the effective date of the Compact, the Commission shall


convene and review the enactment of each of the charter member


states to determine if the statute enacted by each such charter


member state is materially different than the model Compact statute.


a. A charter member state whose enactment is found to be


materially different from the model compact statute


shall be entitled to the default process set forth in


Section 11 of this act, and



Req. No. 2738 Page 41


b. If any member state is later found to be in default,


or is terminated or withdraws from the Compact, the


Commission shall remain in existence and the Compact


shall remain in effect even if the number of member


states should be less than seven.


2. Member states enacting the compact subsequent to the charter


member states shall be subject to the process set forth in paragraph


of subsection B of Section 8 of this act to determine if their


enactments are materially different from the model Compact statute


and whether they qualify for participation in the Compact.


3. All actions taken for the benefit of the Commission in


furtherance of the purposes of the administration of the Compact


prior to the effective date of the Compact or the Commission coming


into existence shall be considered to be actions of the Commission


unless specifically repudiated by the Commission.


4. Any state that joins the Compact shall be subject to the


Commission’s rules and bylaws as they exist on the date on which the


Compact becomes law in that state. Any rule that has been


previously adopted by the Commission shall have the full force and


effect of law on the day the Compact becomes law in that state.


B. 1. Any member state may withdraw from this Compact by


enacting a statute repealing that state’s enactment of the Compact.


A member state’s withdrawal shall not take effect until one hundred


eighty (180) days after enactment of the repealing statute.

Req. No. 2738 Page 42


2. Withdrawal shall not affect the continuing requirement of


the withdrawing state’s licensing authority to comply with the


investigative and adverse action reporting requirements of this


Compact prior to the effective date of withdrawal.


3. Upon the enactment of a statute withdrawing from this


Compact, a state shall immediately provide notice of such withdrawal


to all licensees within that state. Notwithstanding any subsequent


statutory enactment to the contrary, such withdrawing state shall


continue to recognize all licenses granted pursuant to this Compact


for a minimum of one hundred eighty (180) days after the date of


such notice of withdrawal.


C. Nothing in this Compact shall be construed to invalidate or


prevent any licensure agreement or other cooperative arrangement


between a member state and a non-member state that does not conflict


with the provisions of this Compact.


D. This Compact may be amended by the member state. No


amendment to this Compact shall become effective and binding upon


any member state until it is enacted into the laws of all member


states.


SECTION 13. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 4312 of Title 59, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. This Compact and the Interstate Massage Compact Commission’s


rulemaking authority shall be liberally construed so as to

Req. No. 2738 Page 43


effectuate the purposes and the implementation and administration of


the Compact. Provisions of the Compact expressly authorizing or


requiring the promulgation of rules shall not be construed to limit


the Commission’s rulemaking authority solely for those purposes.


B. The provisions of this Compact shall be severable and if any


phrase, clause, sentence, or provision of this Compact is held by a


court of competent jurisdiction to be contrary to the constitution


of any member state, a state seeking participation in the Compact,


or of the United States, or the applicability to any government,


agency, person, or circumstance is held to be unconstitutional by a


court of competent jurisdiction, the validity of the remainder of


this Compact and the applicability to any other government, agency,


person, or circumstance shall not be affected.


C. The Commission may deny a state’s participation in the


Compact or, in accordance with the provisions of subsection C of


Section 11 of this act, terminate a member state’s participation in


the Compact, if the Commission determines that a constitutional


requirement of a member state is a material departure from the


Compact. Otherwise, if this Compact shall be held to be contrary to


the constitution of any member state, the Compact shall remain in


full force and effect as to the remaining member states and to the


member state affected as to all severable matters.


D. Nothing in this act shall prevent or inhibit the enforcement


of any other law of a member state that is not inconsistent with the

Req. No. 2738 Page 44


Compact. Any laws, statutes, regulations, or other legal


requirements in a member state in conflict with the Compact shall be


superseded to the extent of the conflict. All permissible


agreements between the Commission and the member states shall be


binding in accordance with their terms.


SECTION 14. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2738 CAD 1/15/2026 9:20:25 AM

































Req. No. 2738 Page 45